Louisiana, session 2026, HB237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:259(B)(23) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§259. Transfer of agencies and functions to Louisiana Department of Health
* * *
B. The following agencies are placed within the Louisiana Department of
Health and shall exercise and perform their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities as otherwise provided by law:
* * *
(23) Lupus Commission (R.S. 40:1122.11).
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1122.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1122.11. Lupus Commission
A. There is hereby established within the Louisiana Department of Health,
office on women's health and community health, the Lupus Commission.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-157 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 237
B. The commission shall be comprised of the following members:
(1) One member from the Louisiana State Nurses Association.
(2) One member from the Louisiana Primary Care Association.
(3) One member from the Xavier Ochsner College of Medicine.
(4) One member from the Southern University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College School of Nursing.
(5) One member from the Tulane University School of Public Health and
Tropical Medicine.
(6) One member from the Our Lady of the Lake Health System.
(7) One member from the Louisiana Hospital Association.
(8) Five members who are individuals living with lupus.
(9) One member from the Louisiana House of Representatives.
(10) One member from the Louisiana Senate.
(11) One member who is the executive director of the governor's office on
women's policy.
(12) One member from the Ochsner Health System.
(13) One member from Woman's Hospital of Baton Rouge.
C.(1) The members listed in Paragraphs (B)(1) through (B)(7) of this Section
shall be appointed by the governor from a list of qualified candidates nominated by
the respective organizations.
(2) The members listed in Paragraph (B)(8) of this Section shall be appointed
by the governor from a list of self-identified individuals interested in serving on the
commission.
(3) The members listed in Paragraphs (B)(9) and (B)(10) of this Section shall
be appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives and the president of the
Senate, respectively.
(4) The member listed in Paragraph (B)(12) of this Section shall be selected
by the Ochsner Health System.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-157 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 237
(5) The member listed in Paragraph (B)(13) of this Section shall be selected
by the president of Woman's Hospital of Baton Rouge.
D. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.
E.(1) The commission shall adopt rules and regulations to provide for the
governance of the commission. Such rules and regulations shall include but not be
limited to procedures and grounds for the removal of any commission member.
(2) The term of an appointee is four years.
(3) Procedures for filling a vacancy created by the removal, resignation, or
death of any commission member prior to the end of the commission member's term
shall follow those used for initial appointments.
F. Each commission member shall serve without compensation. Legislators
shall receive the same per diem and travel reimbursement for attending a meeting of
the commission as is normally provided for members of the legislature.
Nonlegislative commission members may receive reimbursement for expenses in
accordance with the guidelines of the entity they represent.
G. The chairman shall be elected by the commission for a term to be
determined by the commission.
H. The domicile of the commission is Baton Rouge.
I. The commission shall hold quarterly public meetings unless decided by
a vote of the commission or by order of the chairman.
J. The number of commission members necessary to constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business shall be one half of the entire membership of the
commission. A majority vote of the commission members constituting a quorum is
necessary for any action taken by the commission.
K. The Louisiana Department of Health shall provide administrative
assistance and serve as staff for the commission.
L. The functions of the commission are to:
(1) Evaluate functions and activities of existing groups focused on lupus to
collaborate with and engage stakeholders.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-157 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 237
(2) Support and contextualize reporting on lupus.
(3) Serve as an advisory body to the governor and the Louisiana Department
of Health on matters relating to lupus treatment and care.
(4) Research and review all state regulations, guidelines, policies, and
procedures relative to the treatment and care of individuals with lupus and, when
appropriate, make recommendations to the governor, the secretary of the Louisiana
Department of Health, and the legislature.
(5) Provide a forum for an annual public hearing on matters relating to lupus
and related conditions and provide for other public comment and peer review on
federal and state-funded programs related to lupus.
(6) Make recommendations on policy to ensure that the state establishes
public health monitoring, advances research, and provides novel treatments for those
diagnosed with lupus.
M. The commission shall submit an annual written report to the Senate and
House committees on health and welfare at least sixty days prior to each regular
session. The commission shall include in its report a summary of the data relevant
to the functions set forth in Subsection L of this Section.